Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.414

Center for research and training in intellectual and developmental disabilities—Purpose.

The general purposes of the center shall be:

(1) To provide clinical and laboratory facilities for research on the causes, diagnosis, prevention, and treatment of intellectual and developmental disabilities;

(2) To develop improved professional and in-service training programs in the various disciplines concerned with persons with disabilities;

(3) To provide diagnostic and consultative services to various state programs and to regional and local centers, to an extent compatible with the primary research and teaching objectives of the center.

[ 2010 c 94 s 9; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.414. Prior: 1963 c 193 s 3. Formerly RCW 28.77.434.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2010 c 94: See note following RCW 44.04.280.